Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING COMMISSION
SECTION 1.  Section 23, chapter 121, Oregon Laws 2014, as  amended by section 74, chapter 117,
Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  (1) For each biennium in which any part of the OHSU Cancer  Challenge Article XI-G
Bonds remain outstanding, the [ Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] Higher Education
Coordinating Commission shall request  that the Governor include in the Governor’s budget to the
Legislative Assembly an amount that is  sufficient to pay the bond-related costs that become due in
the biennium.
(2) The Legislative Assembly shall  appropriate to the [ Oregon Department of Administrative
Services] commission  any moneys made available to pay bond-related costs.
(3) Oregon Health and Science University is not obligated to pay the bond-related costs of  the
OHSU Cancer Challenge Article XI-G Bonds.
SECTION 2.  ORS 286A.863 is amended to read:
286A.863. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may, in consultation with the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, adopt rules for the purpose of carrying  out ORS
286A.830 to 286A.863, including, but not limited to, establishing:
(a) Fees and costs to be paid by public universities or community colleges for  administration of
higher education bonds,  including reasonable fees and expenses of the State Treasurer as provided
in ORS 286A.014;
(b) The form, content and timing of information  to be submitted by public universities and
community colleges to be used by the commission and the State Treasurer to  evaluate revenue suf-
ficiency for Article XI-F(1) bonds and availability and sufficiency of matching amounts for Article
XI-G bonds; and
(c) Standards,  terms and conditions for maintaining federal tax benefits related to higher edu-
cation bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 1
(2) The department or the commission, or both, may periodically bill a public university  or
community college,  without duplicating costs billed by contract, for the public university’s or com-
munity college’s  proportional share of costs incurred by the department, or the commission, in con-
nection with higher education bonds, including, but not limited to:
(a) Bond-related costs of higher education bonds  issued or proposed to be issued to finance or
refinance projects of the public university or community college; and
(b) Costs  of legal or financial consultants or advisors, including, without limitation, bond counsel
to the State of Oregon, for services that are provided at  the request of a public university or com-
munity college in connection with higher education bonds that are issued or proposed to be issued.
(3) The department and the commission may each bill at such  intervals as may be established
in the  department’s or commission’s own procedures and shall deposit the moneys received in the
applicable bond fund, bond administration fund or other fund relating to higher  education bonds, as
the department or commission determines is appropriate. A public university  or community college
that receives a bill for bond-related costs shall pay the amount billed by the time and in  the manner
designated in the billing statement.
(4)(a) The department or the commission  may enter into agreements with Oregon Health and
Science University to:
(A) Receive payments from Oregon  Health and Science University of amounts used to pay debt
service on bonds issued by the State  Treasurer to finance joint projects of Oregon Health and Sci-
ence University and one or more public universities; or
(B) Administer tax compliance obligations of Oregon Health and Science University.
(b) Solely for the purposes of receiving payments  of amounts used to pay debt service and ad-
ministering tax compliance obligations related  to the bonds, the department or the commission
may be a  successor to, or an assignee of, the Oregon University System under agreements between
Oregon Health and Science University and the Oregon University System.
(c) The department or the commission  may not assume any obligations or liability as the  suc-
cessor to, or assignee of, the Oregon University System under any  agreements between Oregon
Health and Science University and the  Oregon University System, except for obligations or liability
relating to the receipt of amounts used to pay debt service and  the administration of tax compliance
obligations.
PUBLIC SAFETY
SECTION 3.
 (1)(a) The appropriation set forth in section 7, chapter 673, Oregon Laws
2017, of moneys to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, out  of the General Fund, for
deposit in the Justice Reinvestment Account, is validated.
(b) Use of any moneys from the appropriation set  forth in section 7, chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the purposes  specified in section 9, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, by the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prior to the effective date of this 2018 Act, is validated.
(c) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission is authorized to  expend moneys from the
appropriation set forth in section 7, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, for the purposes specified
in section 5 of this 2018 Act.
(2)(a) The appropriation set forth in section 8,  chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, of moneys
to the Department of  Justice, out of the General Fund, for the Crime Victims’ Services Di-
vision and services for victims of domestic and sexual violence, is validated.
(b) Use of any moneys from the appropriation set  forth in section 8, chapter 673, Oregon
Laws 2017, by the Department of Justice, prior to the  effective date of this 2018 Act, is val-
idated.
SECTION 4.
Section 9, chapter  673, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed and section 5 of this
2018 Act is enacted in lieu thereof.
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish a program to
award supplemental grant funds to counties for downward departure prison diversion  pro-
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 2
grams as part of  the Justice Reinvestment Program described in section 53, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013. Notwithstanding sections 52 and 53  (1)(a), chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,
the commission shall use any moneys appropriated to the commission for the  supplemental
grant program to award supplemental grant funds for downward departure prison  diversion
programs to counties  selected by the commission to receive the funds. The commission shall
give preference to counties  establishing downward departure prison diversion programs on
or after August 8, 2017.
(2) The  commission shall monitor the downward departure prison diversion programs
described in subsection (1) of this section and  evaluate prison utilization by counties that
receive the supplemental grant funds. The commission shall  annually report the evaluation
findings to the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means.
SECTION 6.  Section 14, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  [ (1) Section 9 of this 2017 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023. ]
[(2)] Section 10 , [ of this 2017 Act ] chapter 673,  Oregon Laws 2017,  is repealed on January 2,
2028.
SECTION 7. Section 5 of this 2018 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023.
ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 8.  ORS 475B.416 is amended to read:
475B.416. In  addition to any other liability or penalty provided by law, the Oregon Liquor Con-
trol Commission may impose for each violation of a provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or a rule
adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545  a civil penalty that does not exceed $5,000 for each vio-
lation. The commission shall impose civil penalties under this section in the manner provided by
ORS 183.745. Moneys collected under this section shall  be deposited in the [ Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296 ] General Fund .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 305.084 is amended to read:
305.084. (1) Financial institutions shall participate in a data match system established by the
Department of Revenue, utilizing automated data exchanges to the maximum extent possible.
(2) Using the data match system, not more than once per calendar quarter,  each financial in-
stitution shall conduct a data match with the department that compares a list of delinquent  debtors,
identified by name and  Social Security number or other taxpayer identification number, against a
list of persons  who hold accounts at the financial institution to enable the department to identify
which, if any, delinquent debtors hold accounts at the financial institution. A financial institution
is not required to seek or obtain any  information about delinquent debtors beyond any information
that is provided to the financial institution by the department.
(3) Each calendar quarter, the department shall pay a fee to each financial  institution for con-
ducting the data match  provided for in this section. In the first quarter that the department pays
a fee under this subsection to a financial institution, the fee may not exceed the lesser of  $2,500 or
the actual costs incurred by the financial institution in that calendar quarter for conducting the
data match. In subsequent calendar quarters, the fee may  not exceed the lesser of $150 or the actual
costs incurred by the financial institution in that calendar quarter for conducting the data match.
[(4)(a) The department may add a fee to the amount of the liquidated and delinquent  debt of any
delinquent debtor.]
[(b) The department may  not add a fee under this subsection unless the department has provided
notice to the delinquent debtor of the existence of the debt and of the maximum amount of  the fee that
may be added under this subsection to the debt. ]
[(c) A fee added  under this subsection may not exceed the total data match costs incurred by the
department in the calendar quarter in which the fee is assessed, divided by the average number  of de-
linquent debtors as calculated over the preceding four calendar quarters. ]
[(d) As used in this subsection, “data match costs” means the sum of: ]
[(A) Amounts payable to financial institutions under subsection (3) of this section; and ]
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 3
[(B) Amounts payable to vendors or contractors pursuant to agreements that  are reasonably nec-
essary for the functioning of the data match system. ]
[(5)] (4) The department may temporarily exempt a financial institution  from participation in the
data match system under this section if:
(a) The department determines that the  participation of the financial institution in the data
match system would not be cost-effective for the department;
(b) The department determines  that the financial institution’s participation in the data match
system would be unduly burdensome for the financial institution; or
(c) The financial institution provides the department with written notice from  its supervisory
banking authority that it has  been determined to be undercapitalized, significantly undercapitalized,
or critically undercapitalized, as those  terms are defined under 12 C.F.R. 325.103(b) or 12 C.F.R.
702.102(a).
[(6)] (5)  Financial institutions,  institution-affiliated parties as defined in the Federal Deposit In-
surance Act (12 U.S.C. 1813(u)) and institution-affiliated parties as defined in the Federal Credit
Union Act (12 U.S.C. 1786(r)) are not liable under state law to any person:
(a) For any disclosure of information to the department under this section;
(b) For encumbering or surrendering any assets held  by the financial institution in response to
a notice of lien or levy issued by the department; or
(c) For any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 18.999 is amended to read:
18.999. This section establishes the right of a plaintiff to  recover certain moneys the plaintiff
has expended to recover a  debt under ORS 18.854 or to enforce a judgment and establishes proce-
dures for that recovery. The following apply to this section:
(1) When a plaintiff receives moneys under a garnishment, attachment  or payment, the plaintiff
may proceed as follows:
(a) Before crediting the total amount of moneys received against the judgment  or debt, the
plaintiff may recover and keep from the  total amount received under the garnishment, attachment
or payment any moneys allowed to be recovered under this section.
(b) After recovering moneys as allowed under paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the plaintiff shall
credit the remainder of the moneys received against the judgment or debt as provided by law.
(2) Moneys recovered under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not  be considered moneys paid
on and to be credited against  the original judgment or debt sought to be enforced. No additional
judgment is necessary  to recover moneys in the manner provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The only moneys a plaintiff may recover under subsection (1)(a) of this  section are those
described in subsection (4) of this section that the plaintiff has paid to enforce the existing specific
judgment or debt that the  specific garnishment or attachment was issued to enforce or upon which
the payment was received. Moneys recoverable under subsection  (1)(a) of this section remain re-
coverable and, except  as provided under subsection (8) of this section, may be recovered from mon-
eys received by the plaintiff under subsequent garnishments,  attachments or payments on the same
specific judgment or debt.
(4) This section allows the recovery only of the following:
(a) Statutorily established moneys that meet  the requirements under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, as follows:
(A) Garnishee’s search fees under ORS 18.790.
(B) Fees for delivery of writs of garnishment under ORS 18.652.
(C) Circuit court fees as provided under ORS 21.235 and 21.258.
(D) County court fees as provided under ORS 5.125.
(E) County clerk recording fees as provided in ORS 205.320.
(F) Actual fees or disbursements made under ORS 21.300.
(G) Costs of execution as provided in ORS 105.112.
(H) Fees paid to an attorney for  issuing a garnishment in an amount not to exceed $45 for each
garnishment.
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 4
(I) Costs of an execution sale as described in ORS 18.950 (2).
(J) Fees paid under ORS 21.200 for motions  and responses to motions filed after entry of a
judgment.
(K) Amounts paid to a sheriff for the fees and expenses of  executing a warrant under ORS
105.510.
[(L) Fees added to liquidated and delinquent debts under ORS 305.084 (4). ]
(b) Interest on  the amounts specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection at the rate provided for
judgments in ORS 82.010 for the period  of time beginning with the expenditure of the amount and
ending upon recovery of the amount under this section.
(5) The plaintiff shall be responsible for doing all of the following:
(a) Maintaining  a precise accounting of moneys recovered under subsection (1)(a) of this section
and making the accounting available for any proceeding relating to that judgment or debt.
(b) Providing reasonable notice to the defendant of moneys the plaintiff recovers  under sub-
section (1)(a) of this section.
(6) Moneys recovered under subsection (1)(a) of this section remain subject  to all other pro-
visions of law relating to  payments, or garnished or attached moneys including, but not limited to,
those relating to exemption, claim of exemption, overpayment and holding periods.
(7) Nothing in this section  limits the right of a plaintiff to recover moneys described in this
section or other moneys in any manner otherwise allowed by law.
(8) A writ of garnishment or attachment is not valid if  issued solely to recover moneys recov-
erable under subsection (1)(a) of this  section unless the right to collect the moneys is first reduced
to a judgment or to a debt enforceable under ORS 18.854.
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 11.
(1)(a) At least once every four years, the Secretary of  State shall contract
with a firm qualified to perform an independent actuarial review of the report on the Public
Employees Retirement System prepared under ORS  238.605. The firm shall review the report
that was most recently used to calculate employer contribution rates under ORS 238.225.
(b) The firm conducting the  review required by this section shall use all appropriate
actuarial standards of practice.
(c) The  Secretary of State shall determine the scope of the review required by this sec-
tion. The review must  include, but is not limited to, an examination of the reasonableness
and consistency of the following aspects of the report described in paragraph (a) of  this
subsection:
(A) Actuarial methods used;
(B) Demographic and economic assumptions used;
(C) Census and asset data used;
(D) Valuation of the system, including projected  future benefit payments, system liabil-
ities, system normal cost and funded status;
(E) Employer contribution rates calculated;
(F) Rate collaring policy and calculation;
(G) Assumed rate of return and discount rate used;
(H) Comparison of legislative impact to actual impact; and
(I) Instructions provided by the Public Employees Retirement Board to the actuary.
(d) A review  under this section must include a quantitative and qualitative analysis of
any changes to actuarial methods and demographic and economic  assumptions that were
recommended by the actuary, adopted by the board,  and used to prepare the report under
ORS 238.605.
(e) The  Public Employees Retirement System, the State Treasurer, and the Oregon In-
vestment Council shall cooperate with the firm conducting the review required  by this sec-
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 5
tion in all respects and shall permit the firm full access to all information the  firm deems
necessary to complete the review.
(f) An actuary that prepared a report under ORS 238.605 may not  conduct a review under
this section for a period of six years after the actuary has provided any services for  the
board.
(g) The Public Employees Retirement Board  shall pay the cost of the review performed
under this section.
(2) A review performed under this section shall be available for public inspection,  in ac-
cordance with the  Secretary of State’s established rules and procedures governing public
disclosure of public reports.
(3) The Secretary of State shall submit the review performed under this section to the
Public Employees Retirement Board and the Joint Legislative Audit  Committee no later than
February 15 of the year after the review is initiated.
SECTION 12. The Secretary of State shall  cause the first independent actuarial review
under section 11 of this 2018 Act to be completed no later than December 31, 2019.
OREGON HEALTH AUTHORITY
SECTION 13.  ORS 432.510 is amended to read:
432.510. (1) The Oregon Health Authority , or designee,  shall establish a uniform,  statewide,
population-based registry system for the collection of information determining the  incidence of can-
cer  and  benign or borderline tumors of the brain and central nervous system and related data. The
purpose of the registry shall be to provide information  to design, target, monitor, facilitate and
evaluate efforts to determine the causes  or sources of cancer and benign or borderline tumors
among the residents of this state and to reduce the burden of cancer and  benign or borderline tu-
mors in this state. Such efforts may include but are not limited to:
(a) Targeting populations in need of cancer screening services or evaluating screening or  other
cancer control services;
(b) Supporting the operation  of hospital registries in monitoring and upgrading the care and the
end results of treatment for cancer and benign or borderline tumors;
(c) Investigating suspected clusters or excesses of cancer and benign or borderline tumors both
in occupational settings and in the state’s environment generally;
(d) Conducting studies to identify cancer hazards to the  public health and cancer hazard reme-
dies; and
(e) Projecting the benefits or  costs of alternative policies regarding the prevention or treatment
of cancer and benign or borderline tumors.
(2) The authority shall adopt rules necessary  to carry out the purposes of ORS 432.510 to
432.550 and 432.900, including but not limited to designating which types of cancer and  benign or
borderline tumors of the brain and central nervous system are reportable to the statewide registry,
the data to be reported, the data reporting standards and format and the effective date after which
reporting by health care facilities,  clinical laboratories and practitioners shall be required. When
adopting rules under this subsection, the authority shall, to the greatest extent practicable, conform
the rules to the standards and  procedures established by the American College of Surgeons Com-
mission on Cancer, with the goal of achieving uniformity in the collection and reporting of data.
(3) The authority or designee shall:
(a) Conduct a program of epidemiologic analyses of registry data collected under  subsection (1)
of this section to assess control, prevention, treatment and causation of cancer and benign or
borderline tumors in this state; and
(b) Utilize the data to promote, facilitate and evaluate programs designed to reduce  the burden
of cancer and benign or borderline tumors among the residents of Oregon.
(4) The authority or designee shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 6
(a) Collaborate in studies of  cancer and benign or borderline tumors with clinicians and
epidemiologists and publish reports on the results of such studies; and
(b) Cooperate  with the National Institutes of Health and the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention in providing incidence data for cancer and benign or borderline tumors.
(5) The authority or designee shall establish a training program for the  personnel of partic-
ipating health care facilities and a quality control program for data for cancer and  benign or
borderline tumors reported to the state registry.
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
SECTION 14.  ORS 237.655 is amended to read:
237.655. (1)(a)  If a person appointed or elected as a member of the Legislative Assembly elects
under ORS 237.645 or 237.650 to become a legislator member of the state deferred compensation plan
for the purpose of service in the Legislative Assembly, the  Legislative Assembly shall make em-
ployer contributions to the plan in an amount that is equal to [ six percent of  the member’s salary
plus] the percentage of the member’s salary that would have been contributed to the Public Em-
ployees Retirement Board for the member’s normal cost under ORS  238A.220, as determined by the
actuary under ORS 238.605.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, contributions made to  the plan by the
Legislative Assembly under this subsection may not exceed the maximum allowed by federal law.
(2) If a person appointed or elected as a member of the Legislative Assembly  elects under ORS
237.645 or 237.650  to become a legislator member of the state deferred compensation plan for the
purpose of service in  the Legislative Assembly, and the person also participates in the state deferred
compensation plan in the manner  provided by ORS 243.401 to 243.507 as other than a legislator
member, the total contributions  made to the plan by the person and by the employer under sub-
section (1) of this section may not exceed  the maximum allowed by federal law governing the plan’s
tax qualification.
(3) Except for the contributions required by subsection (1) of  this section, the Legislative As-
sembly may  not “pick-up,” assume or pay any contributions on behalf of a legislator member of the
state deferred compensation plan.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 237.655  by section 14 of this 2018 Act become op-
erative on February 1, 2019.
SECTION 16. Section 4, chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 5, chapter
840, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 15, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
SECTION 17.  ORS 171.072, as amended by section  1, chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
171.072. (1) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive for services an annual salary
[determined as provided under ORS 292.930. ] that equals the greater of:
(a) One step below the maximum step of Salary Range 1 in  the Management Service
Compensation Plan in the executive department as defined in ORS 174.112; or
(b) Seventeen percent of the salary of a circuit court judge.
(2) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of  Representatives each shall re-
ceive for services,  as additional salary, an amount equal to the salary allowed each of them as a
member under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive, as an allowance for expenses  not oth-
erwise provided for, a per diem determined as provided in subsection (9) of this section for each  day
within the period that the Legislative Assembly is in session, to be paid with the  salary provided
for in subsection (1) of this section. Pursuant to procedures determined by the  Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, a member may draw from an accrued allowance.
(4) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive, as  an allowance for expenses incurred
in the performance of  official duties during periods when the legislature is not in session, $400 for
each calendar month or part of a calendar  month during those periods, to be paid monthly, and
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 7
subject to approval of the President  of the Senate or Speaker of the House of Representatives,
mileage expenses and a per diem determined as  provided in subsection (9) of this section for each
day a member is engaged in the  business of legislative interim and statutory committees, including
advisory committees and  subcommittees of advisory committees, and task forces and for each day
a member serves on interstate bodies, advisory committees and other entities on which  the member
serves ex officio, whether or not the entity is a legislative one.
(5) In addition  to the mileage and per diem expense payments provided by this section, a member
of the Legislative  Assembly may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses, subject
to approval by the President of the Senate or Speaker of  the House of Representatives, for legisla-
tive business outside of the state.
(6) The President of the  Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may delegate
to the chairpersons of interim and statutory committees and task forces the  approval authority
granted to the President and the Speaker by subsection (4) of  this section, with respect to expenses
incurred in attending any meeting of a particular committee or task force.
(7) Amounts  received under subsections (3) to (5) of this section are excluded from gross income
and expenditures of the amounts  are excluded in computing deductions for purposes of ORS chapter
316. If there is attached to the personal income return a schedule of  all ordinary and necessary
business expenses paid during the tax year as a member of the Legislative  Assembly, a deduction
may be claimed on the return for legislative expenses paid in excess of  the amounts received under
subsections (3) to (5) of this section.  Expenses of members of the Legislative Assembly who are re-
imbursed by the state for actual expenses for  meals and lodging associated with state travel for the
same period during which a legislator receives per diem are subject to state income tax.
(8) For periods when the Legislative  Assembly is not in session, the Legislative Administration
Committee shall provide for a telephone and an expense  allowance for members of the Legislative
Assembly that is in addition  to the amount allowed under subsection (4) of this section. In deter-
mining the amount of allowance for members, the committee shall consider the geographic  area of
the member’s district. The  additional allowance shall reflect travel expenses necessary to commu-
nicate in districts of varying sizes.
(9) The per diem allowance referred to in subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be the
amount fixed for per diem allowance that is  authorized by the United States Internal Revenue Ser-
vice to be excluded from gross income without itemization.
SECTION 18.  ORS 292.930 is amended to read:
292.930. Each of the following elective officers  shall be paid an annual salary on a monthly basis
as determined by the Legislative Assembly each biennium:
(1) Governor.
(2) Secretary of State.
(3) State Treasurer.
(4) Attorney General.
(5) Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(6) Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals.
(7) Court of Appeals Judge.
(8) Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
(9) Supreme Court Judge.
(10) Circuit Court Judge.
(11) Tax Court Judge.
[(12) State Senator. ]
[(13) State Representative. ]
JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 19.
 ORS 292.406 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 8
292.406. (1)(a) The annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of  Appeals shall be [ $135,688
for the year  beginning January 1, 2015, and for each year thereafter ] $147,560 for the period begin-
ning on January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(b) On [ January 1, 2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of Ap-
peals, as adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Court of Appeals  shall be [ $132,820 for the
year beginning January 1,  2015, and for each year thereafter ] $144,536 for the period beginning on
January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(b) On [ January 1,  2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the annual salary of each other judge of the Court of
Appeals, as adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 20.  ORS 292.411 is amended to read:
292.411. (1)(a) The annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court  shall be [ $138,556 for
the year beginning January 1, 2015, and for each year thereafter ] $150,572 for the period  beginning
on January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(b) On [ January 1, 2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the annual salary of the Chief  Justice of the Supreme
Court, as adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court shall be  [$135,688 for the year
beginning January 1, 2015, and for each year  thereafter ] $147,560 for the period beginning on
January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(b) On [ January 1, 2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the annual salary of each other judge of the  Supreme
Court, as adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 21.  ORS 292.416 is amended to read:
292.416. (1) The annual salary of each judge  of a circuit court shall be [ $124,468 for the year
beginning January 1, 2015, and for each year  thereafter ] $135,776 for the period beginning on
January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(2) On [ January 1, 2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court, as  ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 22.  ORS 292.426 is amended to read:
292.426. (1) The annual salary of the judge of the  Oregon Tax Court shall be [ $128,164 for the
year beginning January 1, 2015, and for each year thereafter ] $139,652 for the  period beginning on
January 1, 2017, and ending on June 30, 2018 .
(2) On [ January 1, 2017 ] July 1, 2018 , the  annual salary of the judge of the Oregon Tax Court,
as adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
OREGON VOLUNTEERS COMMISSION FOR
VOLUNTARY ACTION AND SERVICE
SECTION 23.  ORS 458.555 is amended to read:
458.555. (1) There is established the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action  and
Service within the [ Office of the Governor ] Higher Education Coordinating Commission .
(2) The Oregon Volunteers  Commission for Voluntary Action and Service  shall consist of
at least 15 members appointed by the Governor and may consist of not more than 25  members ap-
pointed by the Governor.
(3) The term of office of each member is three years, but a member serves at  the pleasure of the
Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a  successor
whose term begins on the first day of the next following month. A member is  eligible for reap-
pointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The appointment of the  members of the Oregon Volunteers  Commission for Voluntary
Action and Service  is subject to confirmation by  the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS
171.562 and 171.565.
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 9
(5) A member of the Oregon Volunteers  Commission for Voluntary Action and  Service  is
entitled to receive, from moneys available to  the commission, actual and necessary travel and other
expenses incurred in the performance of official duties as provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 24.  ORS 458.568 is amended to read:
458.568. The Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service shall:
(1) Develop programs and  provide oversight and administration of programs granted to this state
by the Corporation for National and Community Service under the National and Community Service
Trust Act of 1993, as amended, (P.L. 103-82).
(2) Prepare state applications to the Corporation  for National and Community Service for fi-
nancial assistance for state-based service programs.
[(3) Develop a statewide plan that is designed to meet  or exceed the Oregon benchmark on
volunteerism.]
[(4)] (3)  Develop projects, training methods, curriculum materials and  other materials and ac-
tivities related to state service programs that receive assistance directly  from the Corporation for
National and Community Service.
[(5)] (4)  To engage citizens in service and to strengthen communities, create statewide access
for all Oregon citizens to a variety of volunteer opportunities by:
(a) Evaluating the status  of volunteerism in the public, private and nonprofit sectors of this
state;
(b) Examining methods to strengthen the capacity of  volunteer organizations to support citizen
involvement; and
(c) Educating all citizens about the importance of citizen involvement and voluntary action.
[(6)] (5)  Encourage youth and young adults to engage in their communities through  voluntary
action by:
(a) Assisting  efforts to inform young Oregonians about opportunities for involvement in the
public, private and nonprofit sectors;
(b) Promoting the value  of service learning as an educational strategy in the kindergarten
through higher educational systems; and
(c) Collaborating with groups to advocate for youth voice in the public, private and  nonprofit
governing  structures.
[(7)] (6) Promote recognition of volunteerism and service into the daily operation of  public, pri-
vate and nonprofit sectors throughout the state by:
(a) Promoting a statewide volunteer recognition plan open to all sectors; and
(b) Assisting efforts by Oregon communities to encourage citizen involvement in volunteerism.
[(8)] (7) Biennially submit a report to the Governor and the Legislative Assembly as  provided
under ORS 192.230 to 192.245:
(a) Detailing commission activities during the preceding two-year period;
(b) Reviewing and summarizing, to the extent the  commission deems relevant, the content of
reports accepted by the commission on behalf of the Governor;
(c) Assessing the state of [ volunteerism] national service  in Oregon; and
(d) Containing specific recommendations  for any additional legislation the commission deems
necessary to carry  out the purpose of the Oregon Volunteer and Community Service Act or to im-
prove the effectiveness or efficiency of the commission.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 458.573 is amended to read:
458.573. In accordance with applicable provisions in ORS chapter 183, the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission, in consultation with the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary
Action and Service , may adopt rules:
(1) Establishing standards and guidelines for applications for grants; and
(2) Establishing standards and requirements for administration of programs funded by grants.
SECTION 26.
ORS 458.563 is repealed.
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 10
SECTION 27. The amendments  to ORS 458.555, 458.568 and 458.573 by sections 23 to 25
of this 2018 Act and the repeal of ORS 458.563 by  section 26 of this 2018 Act become operative
on July 1, 2018.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 29. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4163 (HB 4163-A) Page 11